src/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON vese-QNT
+Pron: _КУДО-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
+Pron: Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
+Adn: WORD-END ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
